Utah statutes.
34-38-4.   Samples -- Identification and collection.

In order to test reliably for the presence of drugs or alcohol, an employer may require samples from his employees and prospective employees, and may require presentation of reliable identification to the person collecting the samples.  Collection of the sample shall be in conformance with the requirements of Section 34-38-6.  The employer may designate the type of sample to be used for testing.

